Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8213
Membership in guaranty associations.

A captive insurer shall not be a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association or the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association. The Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act and the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act shall not be applicable to coverage offered by a captive insurer.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 47.

Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2720.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2418.